lexd_components/hyw-names_bible.lexd
########################################
##### Names
# Names in the Bible that are taken from ...
#  from https://bible-links.org/keywords.php?type=1 are place names, some unreducible 
#     without իա, and some reducible with իա
#  from https://bible-links.org/keywords.php?type=2 are human names
#  from https://bible-links.org/keywords.php?type=5 are month names, as normal nouns
